Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2536.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the following:* * *(8.2) Article XVII-M.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MDIRECT SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS TAX CREDITSection 1701-M. Scope of article.This article relates to the direct support professionals tax credit.Section 1702-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Direct support professional." An individual who is employed to provide direct support professional services."Direct support professional services." Services provided to individuals with developmental or intellectual disabilities, including assistance with activities of daily living, health care support, habilitation services and employment assistance."Qualified taxpayer." A taxpayer who is employed as a direct support professional and who meets the eligibility requirements under section 1703-M(a)."Tax credit." The direct support professionals tax credit authorized under this article."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III."Taxpayer." An individual subject to taxes imposed under 20260HB2536PN3436 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Article III.Section 1703-M. Tax credit.(a) Application.--A qualified taxpayer may apply for a tax credit under this article against the qualified taxpayer's tax liability in a manner determined by the department. The application shall include all of the following:(1) The name and tax identification number of the qualified taxpayer.(2) Documentation that the qualified taxpayer is employed as a direct support professional.(3) Any other information that the department may require.(b) Form.--The department shall post the tax credit application on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Filing.--A qualified taxpayer shall submit an application for a tax credit as an attachment to the qualified taxpayer's return filed under section 330.(d) Notification.--The department shall notify the applicant of the status of the tax credit approval within 60 days of receipt of a completed application.(e) Eligibility.--For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, a qualified taxpayer shall be eligible for a credit not to exceed $1,000 against the qualified taxpayer's tax liability. A qualified taxpayer with an adjusted gross income of $100,000 or more shall not be eligible for the tax credit under this article.(f) Refundability.--If the amount of the tax credit allowable under this section exceeds the qualified taxpayer's tax liability, the department shall refund the excess to the 20260HB2536PN3436 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualified taxpayer.(g) Limitation.--The total amount of tax credits authorized under this article shall not exceed $2,000,000 in any fiscal year. If the total amount of tax credits claimed exceeds the limit specified under this subsection, the department shall allocate the credits on a pro rata basis among all eligible claimants.(h) Guidelines.--The department may publish guidelines necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this article.Section 1704-M. Report to General Assembly.(a) Report.--No later than December 31, 2026, and by December 31 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report on the administration of the tax credit under this article.(b) Contents.--The report shall include all of the following:(1) The number of qualified taxpayers who claimed the tax credit.(2) The total amount of tax credits approved.(3) Any recommendations for changes in the calculation or administration of the tax credit.(c) Recipients.--The report shall be submitted to all of the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.20260HB2536PN3436 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 1705-M. Expiration.The authority of the department to approve claims for tax credits under this article shall expire December 31, 2030.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2536PN3436 - 5 - 123456